Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.190

Violation—Consumer protection act—Remedies.

The legislature finds and declares that any violation of this chapter substantially affects the public interest and is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and an unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce as set forth in RCW 19.86.020. Remedies available under chapter 19.86 RCW shall not affect any other remedy the injured party may have.

[ 1991 c 355 s 19.]